Hawaii statutes.
[§37-77.5 Claims against the State;
remedial measures.] (a) The attorney general shall develop and implement
a procedure, no later than October 1, 1999, for advising its client agencies on
how to avoid future claims, by requesting client agencies to take corrective
action to eliminate or mitigate those factors identified by the attorney
general as contributing to the State's negligence. Based upon this advice, the
client agencies shall develop new policies or modify existing practices to
avoid repetition of similar claims.

(b) The attorney general shall submit a report
to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate,
and the chairs of the house and senate judiciary committees no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of each regular legislative session
describing the claims and the attendant circumstances therein and containing
the advice for corrective action rendered to the agency. The report shall also
contain the remedial measures which the attorney general shall take or
recommended that the legislature take if an agency fails to take corrective
action within a reasonable period of time. The report shall be deemed a
confidential and privileged communication to the legislature and shall not be
disclosed pursuant to sections 92F-13 and 92F-19(b). [L 1999, c 111, §5]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next